New York, session 2025-2026, S3834.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 709 of the executive law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (w) to read as follows: 3 (w) Promulgate rules and regulations within twelve months of the 4 effective date of this paragraph, in consultation with the department of 5 transportation and the department of state, to ensure that: 6 (i) any person or organization, or any subsidiary or affiliate, 7 including a franchise, in the business of renting trucks, vans or trail- 8 ers to the public from locations in this state, be registered with the 9 division of homeland security and emergency services; 10 (ii) each such person or organization maintains accurate records of 11 any person renting a truck, van or trailer for at least two years; and 12 (iii) any person or organization, or any subsidiary or affiliate, 13 including a franchise, in the business of renting trucks, vans or trail- 14 ers to the public require a valid driver's license and at least one 15 other form of identification to rent trucks, vans or trailers and 16 require that meaningful assurances are made by the rental entity to 17 verify the identity of any person renting a truck, van or trailer; 18 (iv) any person renting a truck, van or trailer may be checked against 19 state or federal criminal databases for the purposes of screening for 20 possible terrorists; and 21 (v) the division shall develop and promote best practices for the 22 truck rental industry in this state, and work to educate persons and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01534-01-5 S. 3834 2 1 agencies renting trucks, vans and trailers on how to detect and report 2 suspicious activity as defined by the division. 3 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 396-z of the general business law, as 4 amended by chapter 109 of the laws of 2018, is amended by adding a new 5 paragraph (m) to read as follows: 6 (m) "Truck rental company" means any person or organization, or any 7 subsidiary or affiliate, including a franchisee, in the business of 8 renting trucks, vans or trailers to the public from locations in this 9 state. 10 § 3. Subdivision 1 of section 396-z of the general business law, as 11 amended by chapter 731 of the laws of 2006, is amended by adding a new 12 paragraph (k) to read as follows: 13 (k) "Truck rental company" means any person or organization, or any 14 subsidiary or affiliate, including a franchisee, in the business of 15 renting trucks, vans or trailers to the public from locations in this 16 state. 17 § 4. Section 396-z of the general business law is amended by adding a 18 new subdivision 13-b to read as follows: 19 13-b. For truck rental companies, the following disclosure notice 20 shall be made on the face of the rental agreement either by stamp, label 21 or as part of the written contract or on any other written document 22 provided to the authorized driver at the time such driver takes 23 possession of the vehicle, shall be set apart in boldface type and in no 24 smaller print than ten point type: 25 NOTICE: BY ENTERING INTO THIS RENTAL AGREEMENT, YOU UNDERSTAND THAT 26 YOUR NAME AND INFORMATION MAY BE CHECKED AGAINST STATE OR FEDERAL CRIMI- 27 NAL DATABASES FOR THE PURPOSES OF SCREENING FOR POSSIBLE TERRORISTS. 28 § 5. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 29 have become a law; provided that the amendment to section 396-z of the 30 general business law made by section two of this act shall not affect 31 the repeal of such section and shall be deemed repealed therewith, when 32 upon such date the provisions of section three of this act shall take 33 effect; and provided, further, that the amendment to section 396-z of 34 the general business law made by section four of this act shall survive 35 the repeal and reversion of such section as provided in subdivision (a) 36 of section 4 of chapter 109 of the laws of 2018, as amended; provided 37 further that any rules and regulations necessary to implement the 38 provisions of this act on its effective date are authorized to be 39 promulgated on or before such effective date.